Wisconsin, session 2025, AB399.
do enact as follows:AB399,14Section 1. 196.203 (1g) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB399,2,71196.203 (1g) (b) An alternative telecommunications utility certified under 2this section pursuant to s. 196.50 (2) (j) 1. a. is subject to ss. s. 196.219 (2r) and 3196.503, and, with respect only to wholesale telecommunications services, is subject 4to ss. 196.03 (1) and (6), 196.219 (4), 196.28, and 196.37; and, if such an alternative 5telecommunications utility was regulated as a price-regulated telecommunications 6utility prior to June 9, 2011, the alternative telecommunications utility’s intrastate 7dedicated access rates shall mirror its interstate dedicated access rates.AB399,28Section 2. 196.50 (2) (j) 1. b. of the statutes is amended to read:AB399,3,119196.50 (2) (j) 1. b. Provide notice to the commission to recertify the 10telecommunications utility under this subsection and impose on the 11telecommunications utility only those provisions of this chapter specified in this 12subd. 1. b. No later than 30 days after receiving notice under this subd. 1. b., the 13commission shall issue an order that grants recertification under this subsection 14and that imposes on the telecommunications utility only those provisions of this 15chapter specified in this subd. 1. b. The telecommunications utility shall be exempt 16from all provisions of this chapter, except ss. 196.01, 196.016, 196.025 (6), 196.191, 17196.206, 196.212, and 196.219 (2r), and 196.503; and except those provisions in s. 18196.203 (4m) (a) that are imposed on all alternative telecommunications utilities 19under s. 196.203 (3); and except, with respect to its wholesale telecommunications 20services only, ss. 196.03 (1) and (6), 196.219 (4), 196.28, and 196.37. If required by 21the public interest, the commission may, with respect only to intrastate switched 22access services, impose on the telecommunications utility s. 196.03 (1) and (6) and 23196.37, except that the commission may not impose s. 196.03 (1) or (6) without also 24imposing s. 196.37 on the telecommunications utility. The granting of the 1recertification shall operate to terminate the telecommunications utility’s prior 2certification. All regulatory requirements related to the prior certification that are 3inconsistent with the requirements of or regulation allowed under this subd. 1. b., 4including all such requirements imposed by the certification, and all such 5requirements imposed by the commission, whether by statute or commission rule or 6order, on the telecommunications utility are terminated on the effective date of the 7order unless the telecommunications utility, in its notice to the commission seeking 8recertification under this subd. 1. b., requests to remain subject to one or more 9requirements of its prior certification that do not violate the telecommunications 10utility’s requirements or obligations under this chapter and the commission does 11not deny the request in its recertification order.AB399,312Section 3. 196.503 of the statutes is repealed.AB399,3,1313